Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2031
Integrated solid waste management plan; filing; approval.

On or before October 1, 1994, an integrated solid waste management plan shall be filed with the department on behalf of each county and municipality. Such plan shall be approved by the department if it is found to be in compliance with the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act and the rules and regulations adopted under the act.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 31.